Utah statutes.
58-42a-305.   Limitation upon occupational therapy services provided by an occupational therapist assistant.

(1)  An occupational therapist assistant shall perform occupational services under the supervision of an occupational therapist as set forth in Section 58-42a-306.

(2) (a)  An occupational therapist assistant may not write an individual treatment plan or approve or cosign modifications to a treatment plan.

(b)  An occupational therapist assistant may contribute to and maintain a treatment plan.

